src/propernoun-smj-lex.txt
! ================================ !
! Lule Sáme Proper noun morphology !
! ================================ !


! Even



! Name lexica

! Even syllable
! =============

! No CG

LEXICON ACCRA-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani: ACCRADECL ;

LEXICON ACCRA-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj: ACCRADECL ; 
 
LEXICON ACCRA-org
 +N+Prop+Org: ACCRADECL ; 
 
LEXICON ACCRA-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:  ACCRADECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB
 
LEXICON ACCRA-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:  ACCRADECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB

LEXICON ACCRA-femsur
 +N+Prop+Fem:  ACCRADECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Sur:  ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB
 
LEXICON ACCRA-malfem
 +N+Prop+Fem:  ACCRADECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal:  ACCRADECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB

LEXICON ACCRA-objplc
 +N+Prop+Obj: ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:  ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;
 
LEXICON ACCRA-femplc
 +N+Prop+Fem: ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:  ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;
 
LEXICON ACCRA-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur: ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB
 
LEXICON ACCRA-malsur
 +N+Prop+Sur: ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB
 +N+Prop+Mal:  ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB
 
LEXICON ACCRA-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:  ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

LEXICON ACCRA-surplc ! Names that are both surnames and place names
 +N+Prop+Sur: ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB
 +N+Prop+Plc: ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

LEXICON ACCRA ! Vowel-final names without Gradation and Ill change
 +N+Prop: ACCRADECL ;

LEXICON ACCRADECL
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-DC ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB

LEXICON ACCRA-DC
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: R ;       
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Ill:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: R ;      
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;
 +Pl+Nom: K ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i     
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;
 +Pl+Com:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Com:X5jn K ;

LEXICON MARJA-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem: MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB

LEXICON MARJA-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani: MARJADECL ;

LEXICON MARJA-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal: MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB
 
LEXICON MARJA-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj: MARJADECL ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-org
 +N+Prop+Org: MARJADECL ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill change (place names)
 +N+Prop+Plc: MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:Q1@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

LEXICON MARJA-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur: MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB

!LEXICON MARJA ! No longer in use, all members are tagged.
! +N+Prop: MARJADECL ;

LEXICON MARJADECL ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill change (person names)
 @U.Cap.Obl@ MARJA-DC ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB

LEXICON MARJA-DC
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: R ;        
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X4j K ;
 +Sg+Gen:Q1 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:Q1 R ;      
 +Sg+Acc:Q1v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:Q1n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:Q1s K ;
 +Pl+Nom:Q1 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q1j K ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q1j R ;     
 +Pl+Acc:Q1jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:Q1jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:Q1jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:Q1js K ;
 +Pl+Com:Q1j K ;
 +Sg+Com:Q1X5jn K ;


!LEXICON NIKOSIIJA-plc !XXX Check.
! +N+Prop+Plc: NIKOSIIJADECL ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@laddj DEARVVASLAS ;	!SUB
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A+Attr@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@laddj ATTR ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@laddj JOHTOLAT ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@laddja ISSORASSA- ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@laddja PxV ; ! tentative.
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A+Ess@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@laddjan K ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A+Ess@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@laddjan PxC ; ! tentative, check.
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@laddja EABBUCASE2 ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

!LEXICON NIKOSIIJADECL !Names with ending -iija, a-illative
!ACCRA-DC ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani: NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem: NYSTØDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB

LEXICON NYSTØ-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:  NYSTØDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB

LEXICON NYSTØ-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:  NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-org
 +N+Prop+Org:  NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:  NYSTØDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB

LEXICON NYSTØ-surplc
 +N+Prop+Sur:  NYSTØDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB
 +N+Prop+Plc:  NYSTØDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:a@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:  NYSTØDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:a@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

LEXICON NYSTØ ! Vowel-final, heavy syll
 +N+Prop: NYSTØDECL ;
 
LEXICON NYSTØDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB
! @U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ NYSTØ-DC ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL 
 +Sg+Nom: K ;	
 +Sg+Nom: R ;			
! +Sg+Ela:%:s K ; ! Nystø:s  !SUB
! +Sg+Ine:%:n K ; ! Nystø:s  !SUB
 +Sg+Gen#:a# R ; !SUB !for placenames 
 +Sg+Gen#:# R ; ! for placenames 
     NYOBL ;
 :%: NYOBL ; !SUB ! to NYOBL, optional delimiter marks. sub?
 :%- NYOBL ; !SUB
 :1 NYOBL ; !SUB

!LEXICON NYSTØ-DC
! +laš:lažž DEARVVASLAS ;

LEXICON NYOBL
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: R ;        
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: R ;       
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;
 +Pl+Nom: K ;
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;
 +Pl+Gen:j R ;      
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;
 +Pl+Com:j K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Nom:a K ;  !SUB
 +Sg+Nom:a R ;     !SUB   
 +Sg+Ill:aj K ;  !SUB
 +Ess:an K ;  !SUB
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;  !SUB
 +Sg+Gen:a R ;     !SUB  !^C^
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;   !SUB
 +Sg+Ine:an K ;  !SUB
 +Sg+Ela:as K ;  !SUB
 +Pl+Nom:a K ;   !SUB
 +Pl+Gen:aj K ;   !SUB
 +Pl+Gen:aj R ;     !SUB !^C^
 +Pl+Acc:ajt K ;   !SUB
 +Pl+Ill:ajda K ;   !SUB
 +Pl+Ine:ajn K ;   !SUB
 +Pl+Ela:ajs K ;   !SUB
 +Pl+Com:aj K ;   !SUB
 +Sg+Com:ajn K ;  !SUB


LEXICON BERN-ani
!Different lexicon for animals. Eurokas.
 +N+Prop+Ani: BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERN-mal
! Different lexicon for male persons. Finn. Torfinn.
 +N+Prop+Mal: BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB
 
LEXICON BERN-surmal
! Different lexicon for male persons & personal surnames. 
 +N+Prop+Mal: BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur: BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB

LEXICON BERN-fem
! Different lexicon for female persons. Audhild.
 +N+Prop+Fem: BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB


LEXICON BERN-femplc
! Different lexicon for female persons. Audhild.
 +N+Prop+Fem: BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB
 +N+Prop+Plc: BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:a@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;
 
!LEXICON BERN-femsur ! Not in use.
! Different lexicon for female persons & personal surnames. 
! +N+Prop+Fem: BERNDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Sur: BERNDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB

LEXICON BERN-sur
! Different lexicon for personal surnames. Blind
 +N+Prop+Sur: BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB

LEXICON BERN-plc
! Different lexicon for place names. Bern.
 +N+Prop+Plc: BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:a@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

LEXICON BERN-surplc
! Different lexicon for names that are both surnames and places.
 +N+Prop+Sur: BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc: BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:a@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;
 
LEXICON BERN-objsur
! Different lexicon for names that are both surnames and places.
 +N+Prop+Sur: BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Obj: BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERN-orgsur
! Different lexicon for names that are both surnames and places.
 +N+Prop+Sur: BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Org: BERNDECL ;


LEXICON BERN-org
! Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.
 +N+Prop+Org: BERNDECL ;

LEXICON ProperNoun
Laxaa ACCRA; ! 
Laxaa ACCRA; ! 
Aarsehtta MARJA-sur ;
Aase ACCRA-femsur ;
Ai NYSTØ-surplc ; !SUB
Bern^konvenšuvdna MARJA-obj ; !Duommá
Bibi ACCRA-fem ;
Birk BERN-mal ;
Birske^by NYSTØ-org ;
Blom^li NYSTØ-sur ; !SUB
Bosra ACCRA-plc ;
Boŋ0gu:Boŋ'gu MARJA-sur ;
Britney NYSTØ-fem ;
Bruce ACCRA-mal ;
Böhmer^wald:Böhmer^wald9 BERN-plc ;
Bøyle^foss^bru NYSTØ ;
Cahpe^vuotna MARJA-plc ;
Cambrai NYSTØ-plc ; !SUB
Campbell BERN-sur ;
Che NYSTØ-mal ;
Columbi^a ACCRA-objplc ;
Company NYSTØ-obj ; !SUB
Conference ACCRA-obj ;
Dags^revy NYSTØ-org ;
Delmen^horst:Delmen^horst9 BERN-surplc ;
Departements-Tidende ACCRA-org ;
Deportivo% Loaŋko^dievvá MARJA-org ;
Dolly NYSTØ-fem ; !SUB
Dáiv-Isá ACCRA-ani ;
E^phesus BERN-surmal ;
Ei0ra:Ej'ra MARJA-sur ;
Eira ACCRA-femsur ;
Elisabet BERN-fem ;
Eurokas BERN-ani ;
Evá ACCRA-fem ;
Fe ACCRA-plc ;
Finn^márkku^lága MARJA-obj ; !SUB
Fiskar^bank:Fiskar^bank BERN-org ;
Flate^bø NYSTØ ;
For^mo NYSTØ-sur ;
Fu^ad:Fu^ad9 BERN-mal ;
Gallery^kafe NYSTØ-org ;
Gaute ACCRA-mal ;
Geatkkáš^skái0di:Geatkkáš^skáj'di MARJA-plc ;
Gje^stad:Gje^stad9 BERN-sur ;
Gorter-Grøn^vik:Gorter-Grøn^vik BERN-plc ;
Gran^ly NYSTØ-surplc ;
Grims^by NYSTØ-plc ;
Gry NYSTØ-fem ;
Gun0ná:Gun'ná MARJA-fem ;
Gába MARJA-org ;
Gáhppá MARJA-mal ;
Hard^bakke ACCRA-sur ;
Hed^dal BERN-surplc ;
Heddy ACCRA-org ; !Casas Heddy
Herlaug:Herlaug9 BERN-fem ;
Histori^a ACCRA-obj ;
Hol^bø NYSTØ ;
Häkkilä ACCRA-surplc ;
Iis0ku:Iis'ku MARJA-mal ;
Inge ACCRA-malfem ;
Interreg^pro^grám0ma:Interreg^pro^grám'ma MARJA-obj ; !Duommá
Janne ACCRA-malfem ;
Jannicke ACCRA-fem ;
Jo^a^chim:Jo^a^chim9 BERN-mal ;
Joe NYSTØ-mal ;
Jom^fru NYSTØ-obj ;
Juovla-Skál0la:Juovla-Skál'la MARJA-obj ;
Juovla^nigá MARJA-mal ;
Kai NYSTØ-mal ; !SUB
Kari ACCRA-malfem ;
Karle^by NYSTØ-plc ;
Kello^kumpu ACCRA-sur ;
Kerberos BERN-ani ;
Ketty ACCRA-ani ;
Kimmo:Kimmo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Klo NYSTØ ;
Koivu^niemi ACCRA-surplc ;
Kon^ya ACCRA-plc ;
Kyllest:Kyllest9 BERN-surplc ;
Károly NYSTØ-mal ;
Lands^del^ut^valg:Lands^del^ut^valg9 BERN-org ;
Lee^gaard:Lee^gaard9 BERN-sur ;
Leinná:Lejnná MARJA-fem ;
Lemesós BERN-surmal ;
Leppi^niemi ACCRA-surplc ;
Liidne^beahcan^jáv0ri:Liidne^beahcan^jáv'ri MARJA-plc ;
Lille^by NYSTØ-sur ;
Lille^mor BERN-ani ;
Lindis BERN-fem ;
Lisa ACCRA-fem ;
Lommi ACCRA-org ;
Lukka ACCRA-sur ;
Løve ACCRA-obj ;
Mans BERN-mal ;
Martinus BERN-surmal ;
Maurid:Maurid9 BERN-femplc ;
Melsom^vik BERN-plc ;
Mikká MARJA-mal ;
Mo^dals^li NYSTØ-plc ; !SUB
Modoroo NYSTØ-mal ;
Mággá MARJA-sur ;
Már0tá:Már'tá MARJA-fem ;
Nai0ka:Nai'ka MARJA-ani ;
Nes^café NYSTØ-obj ;
Nestlé NYSTØ-org ;
Niillán:Nijllán9 ACCRA ; !WHAT IS THIS?
Nord:Nord9 BERN-orgsur ;
Nord^mo NYSTØ ;
Office ACCRA-obj ;
Orme^myr BERN-surplc ;
Otto-automáhta ACCRA-org ;
Paju^lahti ACCRA-surplc ;
Patala ACCRA-sur ;
Pedagogy NYSTØ-obj ; !SUB
Pegasos BERN-ani ;
Picardie ACCRA-plc ;
Pikku^musta ACCRA-ani ;
Pipin:Pipin9 BERN-surmal ;
Quarter^deck BERN-org ;
Rama^krishna ACCRA-mal ;
René NYSTØ-fem ;
Rex BERN-ani ;
Ry^e NYSTØ-sur ;
Rátkka^joh0ka:Rátkka^joh'ka MARJA-plc ;
Rønn^aug:Rønn^aug9 BERN-fem ;
S-Gabba MARJA-ani ;
Salina ACCRA-fem ;
Salla ACCRA-femplc ;
Same^Neahtta MARJA-org ;
Sara ACCRA-femsur ;
Sarak-Án0ne:Sarak-Án'ne MARJA-fem ;
Selseng:Selseng9 BERN-sur ;
Ski-Doo NYSTØ-ani ;
Skidoo NYSTØ-obj ;
Skov^ly NYSTØ-surplc ;
Skudi ACCRA-ani ;
Snuoggi MARJA-ani ;
Sok0ča:Šok'ča MARJA-ani ;
Som0by:Som'by MARJA-sur ; !SUB
Sten^bukk:Sten^bukk9 BERN-objsur ;
Stöd:Stöd9 BERN-org ;
Sutra ACCRA-obj ;
Sámi^lávde^goddi MARJA-org ; !SUB
Sámi% Info MARJA-obj ;
Sæter^nes BERN-plc ;
Sør^bø NYSTØ ;
Teig^mo NYSTØ-surplc ;
Tuomola ACCRA-sur ;
Turi ACCRA-femsur ;
Tyge ACCRA-mal ;
Tøym^skarli ACCRA-plc ;
Val^by NYSTØ-plc ;
Valio:Valio9 ACCRA-malsur ;
Varila ACCRA-surplc ;
Vespasi^an:Vespasi^an9 BERN-mal ;
Vespucci ACCRA-org ;
Vest^ly NYSTØ-surplc ;
Viiru ACCRA-ani ;
Väkkäraš-Heai0ka:Väkkäraš-Heaj'ka MARJA-mal ;
Wa^yüu NYSTØ-org ;
e^Skuv0la:e^Skuv'la MARJA-org ;
Álehttá MARJA-fem ;
Ásse^báh^várri MARJA-plc ;
Ø^ie NYSTØ-sur ; !SUB
Šlur0fi:Šlur'fi MARJA-ani ;
Katie NYSTØ-fem ;
